West Virginia, session 2025, HB3051.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2D. COMMUNITY EDUCATION. §18-2D-1. Legislative findings and purpose. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the public school system in any community is most effective when it involves and serves all of the people of that community and not just the kindergarten, elementary and secondary school students of that community; and that community education promotes a more efficient use of community facilities through an extension of buildings, personnel and equipment. In recognition of these findings and declarations, it is hereby declared to be the purpose of this article to facilitate the providing of educational, recreational, cultural, social, health and other community services, in accordance with the needs, interests and concerns of the community, through the establishment of community education programs, in cooperation with other governmental agencies and community service organizations, including allocating funds to educate our senior citizens, adults without high school degrees, those persons without sufficient income to otherwise use these services, through community programs with information on estate planning, healthcare, prescriptions, and other available existing services as described in §18-2D-2. §18-2D-2. Definition. For the purpose of this article "community education" means a process by which public facilities in a community are utilized as community centers operated in conjunction with governmental agencies and community service organizations to provide educational services, including, but not limited to, driver education courses, recreational, cultural, social, health, healthcare, prescriptions, estate planning, and other community services for all persons in such community in accordance with the needs, interests and concerns of such the community. §18-2D-3. Implementation and operation of programs. The state Board of Education shall promote the implementation and operation of community education programs throughout the state, and shall, by rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to the provisions of §29A-1-1 et seq. of this code, provide for the government and supervision of such programs. §18-2D-4. County boards of education authorized to participate. Each county board of education in this state is hereby authorized, but not obligated, to shall coordinate a community education program within its county.